src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-amaat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - amāt: # Noun 129 'eng /est amet/fin' - full paradigm
     amāt+N+Sg+Nom: amāt
     amāt+N+Sg+Gen: amāt
     amāt+N+Sg+Par: amātõ
     amāt+N+Sg+Dat: amātõn
     amāt+N+Sg+Ins: amātõks
     amāt+N+Sg+Ill: amātõ
     amāt+N+Sg+Ela: amātst
     amāt+N+Pl+Nom: amātõd
     amāt+N+Pl+Gen: amātõd
     amāt+N+Pl+Par: amātidi
     amāt+N+Pl+Dat: amātõdõn
     amāt+N+Pl+Ins: amātõdõks
     amāt+N+Pl+Ill: amātiž
     amāt+N+Pl+Ela: amātist
